sk-SK: Stupeň pružnosti tkaniny: 4-smerná elasticita; Vysoká elasticita; Nízka elasticita; Stredná elasticita; Neelastická; Iná
cs: Míra pružnosti látky: Pružné ve 4 směrech; Vysoce pružné; Málo pružné; Středně pružné; Nepružné; Jiné
sl-SI: Stopnja raztegljivosti blaga: 4-smerna raztegljivost; Visoka raztegljivost; Nizka raztegljivost; Srednja raztegljivost; Neraztegljivo; Drugo
vi: Mức độ co giãn của vải: Co giãn 4 chiều; Độ co giãn cao; Độ co giãn thấp; Độ co giãn trung bình; Không co giãn; Khác
pt-PT: Nível de elasticidade do tecido: Elasticidade em 4 direções; Alta elasticidade; Baixa elasticidade; Elasticidade média; Sem elasticidade; Outro
hu: Szövet rugalmassági szintje: 4 irányban rugalmas; Nagyfokú rugalmasság; Kevéssé rugalmas; Közepesen rugalmas; Nem rugalmas; Egyéb
fi: Kankaan venyvyystaso: Neljään suuntaan joustava; Erittäin joustava; Vähän joustava; Keskijoustava; Joustamaton; Muu
sv: Stretch: 4-vägsstretch; Hög stretch; Låg stretch; Medium stretch; Ingen stretch; Övrigt
zh-TW: 布料彈性等級: 四向彈性; 高彈性; 低彈性; 中等彈性; 無彈性; 其他
tr: Kumaş esneklik seviyesi: 4 yönlü esneme; Yüksek esneme; Düşük esneme; Orta esneme; Esnek olmayan; Diğer
pt-BR: Nível de elasticidade do tecido: Elasticidade em 4 direções; Alta elasticidade; Baixa elasticidade; Média elasticidade; Sem elasticidade; Outros
de: Dehnungsgrad des Stoffes: 4-Wege-Stretch; Hoher Stretchanteil; Geringer Stretchanteil; Mittlerer Stretchanteil; Ohne Stretchanteil; Sonstiges
fr: Degré d'élasticité du tissu: Extensible dans 4 sens; Haute extensibilité; Faible extensibilité; Extensibilité moyenne; Non extensible; Autre
it: Livello di elasticità del tessuto: Elasticizzato in 4 direzioni; Altamente elasticizzato; Poco elasticizzato; Mediamente elasticizzato; Non elasticizzato; Altro
da: Stoffets strækbarhedsniveau: 4-vejs-stræk; Højt stræk; Lavt stræk; Medium stræk; Uden stræk; Andet
ru: Уровень растяжимости ткани: Растяжимость в 4 направлениях; Высокая растяжимость; Низкая растяжимость; Средняя растяжимость; Не тянется; Другое
el: Επίπεδο ελαστικότητας υφάσματος: Ελαστικότητα 4 κατευθύνσεων; Υψηλή ελαστικότητα; Χαμηλή ελαστικότητα; Μεσαία ελαστικότητα; Μη ελαστικό; Άλλο
ro-RO: Nivelul de elasticitate al țesăturii: Extensibil pe 4 direcții; Elasticitate ridicată; Elasticitate scăzută; Elasticitate medie; Fără elasticitate; Altele
pl: Poziom elastyczności tkaniny: 4-kierunkowy stretch; Mocno rozciągliwe; Słabo rozciągliwe; Średnio rozciągliwe; Nierozciągliwe; Inne
ja: 生地伸縮レベル: 4WAYストレッチ; 高ストレッチ; 低ストレッチ; 中ストレッチ; ノンストレッチ; その他
en: Fabric stretch level: 4-way stretch; High stretch; Low stretch; Medium stretch; Non-stretch; Other
ko: 패브릭 스트레치 레벨: 4방향 스트레치; 고탄력; 저탄력; 중간 탄력; 비신축성; 기타
nl: Rekbaarheid stof: 4-way stretch; Hoge stretch; Lage stretch; Medium stretch; Geen stretch; Overig
es: Nivel de estiramiento de la tela: Estiramiento en 4 direcciones; Muy elástico; Poco elástico; Estiramiento medio; No elástico; Otro
zh-CN: 面料弹力等级: 四面弹; 高弹力; 低弹力; 中弹力; 无弹力; 其他
bg-BG: Ниво еластичност на плата: 4-посочна еластичност; Висока еластичност; Ниска еластичност; Средна еластичност; Без еластичност; Друго
th: ระดับความยืดหยุ่นของผ้า: ยืด 4 ทิศทาง; ยืดหยุ่นสูง; ยืดหยุ่นต่ำ; ยืดหยุ่นปานกลาง; ไม่ยืด; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Audinio tamprumo lygis: Keturiomis kryptimis tamprus; Labai tamprus; Mažai tamprus; Vidutiniškai tamprus; Netamprus; Kitas
hr-HR: Razina rastezljivosti tkanine: Rastezljivo u 4 smjera; Visoka rastezljivost; Niska rastezljivost; Srednja rastezljivost; Bez rastezanja; Ostalo
nb: Strekknivå for stoff: 4-veis stretch; Høy stretch; Lav stretch; Medium stretch; Uten stretch; Annet